Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.760

Cost-of-living adjustments—Alternative calculation—Election.

The department of retirement systems may continue to pay cost-of-living adjustments consistent with the provisions of the statutes repealed by section 11, chapter 345, Laws of 1995, in lieu of the benefits provided by RCW 41.32.489, 41.32.4872, 41.40.197, and 41.40.1986, if the department determines that: (1) A member earned service credit under chapter 41.40 or 41.32 RCW on or after May 8, 1989; and (2) a retiree would receive greater increases in the next ten years under the statutes repealed by section 11, chapter 345, Laws of 1995 than under the provisions of RCW 41.32.489, 41.32.4872, 41.40.197, and 41.40.1986; and (3) the retiree does not elect the benefits provided by chapter 345, Laws of 1995 over the benefits provided under the statutes repealed by section 11, chapter 345, Laws of 1995. The election must be made in a manner prescribed by the department.

[ 1995 c 345 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1995 c 345: See notes following RCW 41.32.489.